Hawaii statutes.
§440-14 Licenses, limitations, renewals.
(a) No boxing contest shall be conducted, held, or given unless all the
parties participating, as designated herein, are licensed by the commission,
and it shall be unlawful for any individual or club to participate in a boxing
contest in any capacity designated herein unless the person is licensed to do
so.

(b) The commission may limit the number of
licenses issued for any purpose as specified in this chapter and may limit the
number of professional boxing contests conducted, held, or given in any city,
town, or in the State.

(c) All licenses shall be for a period of not
more than one year and all licenses shall expire on December 31 of the year in
which the licenses are issued.

(d) The commission, at its discretion and upon
application, may renew the licenses for the following year. Failure to timely
renew any license shall result in the automatic forfeiture of the license. Any
applicant whose license has been forfeited shall file an application for a new
license and meet all current requirements, including successful passage of the
examination, as the case may be, for the license.

(e) Every individual or club licensed under
this chapter shall be subject to the rules adopted by the commission. [L 1929,
c 216, §15; am L 1933, c 164, §2; RL 1935, §7002; RL 1945, §7563; am L 1949, c
264, §9; RL 1955, §165-14; HRS §440-14; am L 1976, c 15, §2; am L 1983, c 241,
§12; am L 2004, c 135, §13]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next